Colorado, session 2026A, HB1083.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Males and females possess unique and immutable biological
differences that manifest prior to birth and increase as they age and
experience puberty;
(b) Biological differences between the sexes are enduring and
may, in some circumstances, warrant the creation of separate social,
educational, athletic, or other arrangements in order to ensure safety and
allow members of each sex to succeed and thrive;
(c) Physical differences between males and females have long
made separate sex-specific sports teams important so that female athletes
have equal opportunities to compete in sports with reduced risk of
physical injury; and
(d) Due to the physical differences between males and females,
having separate athletic teams based on the biological sex of the athletes
-2- HB26-1083

reduces the risk of injury to female athletes, promotes equality between
the sexes, provides opportunities for female athletes to compete against
their female peers rather than against male athletes, and allows female
athletes to fairly compete for athletic accomplishments, including
educational scholarships.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 109 to
title 22 as follows:
ARTICLE 109
Protect Women's and Girls' Sports Act
22-109-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 109 IS THE "PROTECT WOMEN'S
AND GIRLS' SPORTS ACT".
22-109-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 109, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION" MEANS A CORPORATION,
ASSOCIATION, OR ORGANIZATION WITH AT LEAST ONE PRIMARY PURPOSE
OF SPONSORING OR ADMINISTERING EXTRACURRICULAR INTERSCHOLASTIC
ATHLETIC CONTESTS OR COMPETITIONS.
(2) "BOY" MEANS AN ADOLESCENT HUMAN MALE.
(3) "FEMALE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE BIOLOGICAL
REPRODUCTIVE SYSTEM IS ORGANIZED AROUND THE PRODUCTION OF OVA.
A FEMALE INCLUDES A WOMAN AND A GIRL.
(4) "GIRL" MEANS AN ADOLESCENT HUMAN FEMALE.
(5) "MALE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHOSE BIOLOGICAL
REPRODUCTIVE SYSTEM IS ORGANIZED AROUND THE PRODUCTION OF
SPERM. A MALE INCLUDES A MAN AND A BOY.
-3- HB26-1083

(6) "MAN" MEANS AN ADULT HUMAN MALE.
(7) "POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION" MEANS A
PUBLIC OR PRIVATE UNIVERSITY, COLLEGE, OR COMMUNITY COLLEGE
LOCATED IN COLORADO THAT IS A MEMBER INSTITUTION OF AN
ACCREDITING BODY RECOGNIZED BY THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION.
(8) "SCHOOL" MEANS A POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL
INSTITUTION, OR A PUBLIC SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, PRIVATE SCHOOL,
OR DENOMINATIONAL SCHOOL THAT OFFERS INSTRUCTION IN ELEMENTARY
OR SECONDARY GRADES.
(9) "STATE AGENCY" MEANS ANY STATE BOARD, BUREAU,
COMMISSION, DEPARTMENT, INSTITUTION, DIVISION, SECTION, OR OFFICER
OF THE STATE, EXCEPT THOSE IN THE LEGISLATIVE OR JUDICIAL BRANCH.
(10) "WOMAN" MEANS AN ADULT HUMAN FEMALE.
22-109-103. Male and female sports team designations.
(1) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL ATHLETIC TEAM OR
SPORT THAT IS SPONSORED BY A SCHOOL OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION MUST
EXPRESSLY DESIGNATE THE TEAM OR SPORT AS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
BASED ON THE ATHLETES' BIOLOGICAL SEX:
(a) MALE, MEN, OR BOYS;
(b) FEMALE, WOMEN, OR GIRLS; OR
(c) COEDUCATIONAL OR MIXED.
(2) (a) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL ATHLETIC TEAM OR
SPORT SPONSORED BY A SCHOOL OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION THAT IS
DESIGNATED FOR FEMALES, WOMEN, OR GIRLS MUST NOT BE OPEN FOR
PARTICIPATION BY A MALE STUDENT OR MALE PARTICIPANT.
(b) AN INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL ATHLETIC TEAM OR
-4- HB26-1083

SPORT SPONSORED BY A SCHOOL OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION THAT IS
DESIGNATED FOR MALES, MEN, OR BOYS MUST NOT BE OPEN FOR
PARTICIPATION BY A FEMALE STUDENT OR FEMALE PARTICIPANT UNLESS
THERE IS NO FEMALE TEAM OFFERED OR AVAILABLE FOR THE SPORT FOR
FEMALE STUDENTS OR FEMALE PARTICIPANTS.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (2) DOES NOT RESTRICT THE ELIGIBILITY OF
A STUDENT OR PARTICIPANT FROM PARTICIPATING IN AN INTERSCHOLASTIC
OR INTRAMURAL ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT THAT IS DESIGNATED FOR
COEDUCATIONAL OR MIXED PARTICIPANTS.
(3) A STATE AGENCY, ENTITY, LICENSING OR ACCREDITING
ORGANIZATION, OR ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION SHALL NOT ENTERTAIN A
COMPLAINT, OPEN AN INVESTIGATION, OR TAKE ANY OTHER ADVERSE
ACTION AGAINST A SCHOOL FOR MAINTAINING A SEPARATE
INTERSCHOLASTIC OR INTRAMURAL ATHLETIC TEAM OR SPORT FOR FEMALE
STUDENTS OR FEMALE PARTICIPANTS.
22-109-104. Compliance and enforcement.
IF THE COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION DETERMINES THAT A PUBLIC
SCHOOL OR POSTSECONDARY EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION HAS
INTENTIONALLY REFUSED TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 109, THE
COMMISSIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE PUBLIC SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION OF THE
NONCOMPLIANCE AND ALLOW THE PUBLIC SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION A
REASONABLE AMOUNT OF TIME TO COMPLY. IF THE COMMISSIONER
DETERMINES, AFTER THE REASONABLE COMPLIANCE TIME HAS ELAPSED,
THAT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL OR INSTITUTION IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE AND HAS
NOT MADE A GOOD-FAITH ATTEMPT TO COMPLY, THE COMMISSIONER
SHALL TAKE APPROPRIATE REMEDIAL ACTION WITHIN THE COMMISSIONER'S
AUTHORITY.
-5- HB26-1083

22-109-105. Federal protections for individual with disability
- recognized.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 109 TO
THE CONTRARY, AN INDIVIDUAL BORN WITH A DIAGNOSED DISORDER OF
SEX DEVELOPMENT SHALL RECEIVE ALL LEGAL PROTECTIONS AND
ACCOMMODATIONS AFFORDED UNDER THE FEDERAL "AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET SEQ., AS AMENDED.
22-109-106. Severability.
IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 109 OR THE APPLICATION OF
THIS ARTICLE 109 TO ANY PERSON OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID,
THE INVALIDITY DOES NOT AFFECT OTHER PROVISIONS OR APPLICATIONS
OF THIS ARTICLE 109 THAT CAN BE GIVEN EFFECT WITHOUT THE INVALID
PROVISION OR APPLICATION, AND TO THIS END THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
ARTICLE 109 ARE DECLARED TO BE SEVERABLE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1083